Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.050

Removal of director for cause—When—Procedure.

If a director becomes ineligible or if the director's conduct or habits are such as to reflect discredit upon the association or if other good cause exists, the director may be removed from office by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board of directors at any regular meeting of the board or at any special meeting called for that purpose. No such vote upon removal of a director shall be taken until the director has been advised of the reasons therefor and has had opportunity to submit to the board of directors a statement relative thereto, either oral or written. If the director affected is present at the meeting, he or she shall leave the place where the meeting is being held after his or her statement has been submitted and prior to the vote upon the matter of his or her removal.

[ 2011 c 336 s 758; 1982 c 3 s 31; 1945 c 235 s 19; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-138. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 17; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 3; 1919 c 169 s 3; 1913 c 110 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.